Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3529.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 126C.44, is amended to read: 126C.44 SAFE SCHOOLS REVENUE. Subdivision 1. Safe schools revenue for school districts. new text begin (a) For fiscal year 2025, new text end a school district's safe schools revenue equals its safe schools levy. new text begin (b) For fiscal year 2026 and later, a school district's safe schools revenue equals the greater of: new text end new text begin (1) $32,000; or new text end new text begin (2) the safe schools allowance for that school year times the district's adjusted pupil units for that school year. new text end new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Safe schools allowance. new text end new text begin The safe schools allowance for fiscal year 2026 and later equals $44. new text end Subd. 2. School district safe schools levy. A school district's safe schools levy equals $36 times the district's adjusted pupil units for the school year. new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin Safe schools aid for a school district. new text end new text begin A school district's safe schools aid equals its safe schools revenue less its safe schools levy. If the school district does not levy the entire amount permitted, safe schools aid must be reduced in proportion to the actual amount levied. new text end Subd. 3. new text begin Cooperative units new text end safe schools revenue deleted text begin for intermediate school districtsdeleted text end . new text begin (a) new text end A school deleted text begin district that is a member of an intermediate school district may include in its levy authority under this section the costs associated with safe schools activities authorized under this section for intermediate school district programs. This authority must not exceed the product of $15 and the adjusted pupil units of the member districts. This authority is in addition to any other authority authorized under this section. Revenue raiseddeleted text end new text begin district's cooperative unit safe schools revenue equals $18 times the adjusted pupil units of its member school districts for that school year.new text end new text begin (b) For fiscal years 2025 and 2026, a school district's cooperative unit safe schools aid equals the difference between its cooperative unit safe schools revenue and its cooperative unit safe schools levy. For fiscal year 2027 and later, a school district's safe schools aid equals its cooperative unit safe schools revenue. new text end new text begin (c) A school district's cooperative unit safe schools aid must be paid to the cooperative unit in the form and manner specified by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (d) For purposes of this section, a school district must designate only one cooperative unit as the recipient of its cooperative unit state aid in the form and manner specified by the commissioner. A cooperative unit has the meaning given under section 123A.24, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin (e) For fiscal years 2025 and 2026, a school district must transfer an amount equal to its cooperative unit safe schools levy raisednew text end under this subdivision deleted text begin must be transferreddeleted text end to the deleted text begin intermediate school districtdeleted text end new text begin designated cooperative unitnew text end . new text begin Subd. 3a. new text end new text begin Safe schools aid for charter schools. new text end new text begin For fiscal year 2026 and later, safe schools aid for a charter school equals the safe schools allowance for that school year times the adjusted pupil units for that school year. new text end new text begin Subd. 3b. new text end new text begin Safe schools aid for nonpublic schools. new text end new text begin For fiscal year 2026 and later, safe schools aid for a nonpublic school equals the safe schools allowance for that school year times the school's enrollment for that school year. For purposes of this subdivision, a nonpublic school has the meaning given under section 123B.41, subdivision 9. A nonpublic school must report enrollment and other necessary information to the commissioner in the form and manner specified by the commissioner. The commissioner must establish a payment schedule for safe schools aid for nonpublic schools. new text end new text begin Subd. 3c. new text end new text begin Safe schools aid for American Indian Tribal contract schools. new text end new text begin Safe schools aid for an American Indian Tribal contract school eligible for aid under section 124D.83 equals the safe schools allowance for that school year times the pupil units for that school year computed under section 124D.83, subdivision 2. new text end Subd. 4. Use of safe schools revenue. (a) Safe schools revenue must be reserved and used for directly funding the following purposes or for reimbursing the cities and counties who contract with the deleted text begin districtdeleted text end new text begin schoolnew text end for the following purposes: (1) to pay the costs incurred for the salaries, benefits, and transportation costs of peace officers and sheriffs for liaison in services in the deleted text begin district'sdeleted text end schools; (2) to pay the costs for a drug abuse prevention program as defined in section 609.101, subdivision 3, paragraph (e), in the elementary schools; (3) to pay the costs for a gang resistance education training curriculum in the deleted text begin district'sdeleted text end schools; (4) to pay the costs for security in the deleted text begin district'sdeleted text end schools and on school property; (5) to pay the costs for other crime prevention, drug abuse, student and staff safety, voluntary opt-in suicide prevention tools, and violence prevention measures taken by the school deleted text begin districtdeleted text end ; (6) to pay costs for licensed school counselors, licensed school nurses, licensed school social workers, licensed school psychologists, and licensed alcohol and substance use disorder counselors to help provide early responses to problems; (7) to pay for facility security enhancements including laminated glass, public announcement systems, emergency communications devices, and equipment and facility modifications related to violence prevention and facility security; (8) to pay for costs associated with improving the school climate; (9) to pay costs for colocating and collaborating with mental health professionals who are not deleted text begin districtdeleted text end new text begin schoolnew text end employees or contractorsnew text begin or for school-linked mental health services delivered by telemedicinenew text end ; or (10) to pay for the costs of cybersecurity measures, including updating computer hardware and software, other systems upgrades, and cybersecurity insurance costs. (b) For expenditures under paragraph (a), clause (1), the new text begin school new text end district must initially attempt to contract for services to be provided by peace officers or sheriffs with the police department of each city or the sheriff's department of the county within the district containing the school receiving the services. If a local police department or a county sheriff's department does not wish to provide the necessary services, the district may contract for these services with any other police or sheriff's department located entirely or partially within the school district's boundaries. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; SAFE SCHOOLS AID.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Safe schools aid. new text end new text begin For safe schools aid under Minnesota Statutes, section 126C.44: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end